Washington statutes.
RCW 39.106.060

Authority of members to assist authority and to transfer funds, property, and other assets.

For the purpose of assisting the authority in providing utility services, the members of an authority are authorized, with or without payment or other consideration and without submitting the matter to the electors of those members, to lease, convey, transfer, assign, or otherwise make available to an authority any money, real or personal property or property rights, other assets including licenses, water rights (subject to applicable law), other property (whether held by a member's utility or by a member's general government), or franchises or rights thereunder.

[ 2011 c 258 s 6.]